Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-305
Mineral rights; lease; forfeiture; grounds.

Failure to progress with due diligence, or failure to make reports regularly as provided, or special reports when requested, or the filing of a statement which is untrue as to material facts, will subject the lease to forfeiture, and the termination of the rights of the lessee upon an order of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Laws 1918, Thirty-sixth Spec. Sess., c. 7, § 5, p. 45;

C.S.1922, § 5223;

C.S.1929, § 72-305;

R.S.1943, § 72-305;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 47.